Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3 Statewide Enhanced 911 Service
7-86-314. Removal of member or board.

Effective July 1, 2017, any member of the board of directors of an emergency communications district with four (4) consecutive unexcused absences or who fails to attend at least fifty percent (50%) of regularly scheduled meetings within any twelve-month period shall automatically be removed from the board.

Upon removal of a member pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), the chair of the board of directors or acting chair shall notify the appointing authority in writing that a member has been removed and that a vacancy exists on the board. A successor shall be appointed to serve the remainder of the term of the member being replaced. Any member removed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), shall be eligible for reappointment at any time by the appointing authority.

If a member of a board of directors of an emergency communications district, or a board of directors of an emergency communications district, refuses to carry out either this chapter or an order of the board after May 20, 1998, such member or board may be removed by order of the chancery court in a jurisdiction in which such emergency communications district operates, upon petition by either the board, or a city or county governing body in the service area of such district.

If a member of a board of directors of an emergency communications district or a board of directors of an emergency communications district knowingly or willfully neglects to perform the duties of such office, such member or board may be removed by order of the chancery court in the jurisdiction in which the emergency communications district operates, upon petition by either the board or a county or city governing body in the service area of such district.

Any member removed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) or (b)(2) shall not be eligible for reappointment at any time.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 18; 2016, ch. 674, § 1; 2017, ch. 217, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote (a) which read, “(a) No member of the board of directors of an emergency communications district shall have more than three (3) consecutive unexcused absences from meetings. If such a member has three (3) or more consecutive unexcused absences after May 20, 1998, such member may be removed by order of the chancery court in a jurisdiction in which such emergency communications district operates, upon petition by either the board, or a county or city governing body in the service area of such district.”

The 2017 amendment, in (a), designated the former first sentence as present (1) and designated the former second and third sentences as present (2), respectively, substituted “July 1, 2017” for “July 1, 2016” in (1), and, in (2), added “Upon removal of a member pursuant to this subdivision (a)(1),” at the beginning of the first sentence, deleted “Upon the removal of a member pursuant to this subsection (a),” at the beginning of the second sentence, and added the last sentence; redesignated former (b) and (c) as present (b)(1) and (2), respectively; added (b)(3); and deleted former (d) which read: “Any such board member so removed under this section shall be ineligible for reappointment for a period of not less than forty-eight (48) months. Such provisions shall be in addition to ouster provisions contained in title 8, chapter 47.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 674, § 2. March 29, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 217, § 3. April 28, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §7-86-314 provides the exclusive grounds and procedures for removal of members of the board of directors of an emergency communications district, OAG 09-013 (2/6/09).

The automatic removal provisions of T.C.A. §7-86-314(a) apply, by their plain language, to ex officio emergency communications district (ECD) board members. This does not create any conflict with the requirement of T.C.A. §7-86-105(b)(3) that certain officials serve ex officio as ECD board members. The statute allows those ex officio membership positions to be filled either by the specified official or by a representative of that official. Thus, when an ex officio membership position is vacant because the specified official was automatically removed from the board, the statutory ex officio membership requirement is nevertheless fully satisfied when that position is filled by a representative of the official. OAG 16-39, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (10/11/2016).

7-86-315. Report to governor and speakers of general assembly.

The board shall report annually to the governor and the speakers of the general assembly on the activities of the board for the preceding year. The board shall receive and consider from any source whatsoever, whether private or governmental, suggestions for amendments to this chapter.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 19.

Cross-References. Reporting requirements satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of reports, §3-1-114.

7-86-316. 911 calls in nonemergency situations prohibited — Penalty.

Contacting 911 for some purpose other than to report an emergency or an event that the person contacting 911 reasonably believes to be an emergency is a Class C misdemeanor.

Aggravated nonemergency contact of 911 is contacting 911 as described in subsection (a) where:

An individual makes nonemergency contact to 911 in an offensively repetitious manner;

The nonemergency contact of 911 creates a delay in the response to an emergency; or

The nonemergency contact of 911 results in harm to person or property.

An aggravated nonemergency contact of 911 is a Class A misdemeanor.

Harassing noninitialized 911 phone calls are ten (10) or more nonemergency calls within a one-hour period or twenty (20) or more nonemergency calls within a twenty-four-hour period made to 911 from a handset that is not registered for service with any commercial mobile radio service (CMRS) carrier.

A public safety answering point (PSAP) or a district may authorize the emergency communications board to divert harassing noninitialized 911 phone calls, for a period of no more than twelve (12) hours, to an entity designated by the emergency communications board to receive such calls.

Repetitive harassing noninitialized 911 phone calls are phone calls from a handset from which calls have previously been diverted pursuant to subdivision (c)(2).

A PSAP or a district may authorize the emergency communications board to indefinitely divert repetitive harassing noninitialized 911 phone calls to an entity designated by the emergency communications board to receive such calls; provided, that the entity notifies the caller that the caller may contact the PSAP or district to request it rescind its authorization to divert 911 calls from the caller’s handset.

The emergency communications board, CMRS service providers, providers of non-wireline service, and PSAPs, and their employees, vendors, agents, and authorizing government entities, if any, shall have immunity from liability for diverting or not diverting harassing noninitialized 911 phone calls to an entity designated by the emergency communications board to receive such calls.

An entity designated by the emergency communications board to receive diverted harassing noninitialized 911 phone calls shall have immunity from liability for receiving and processing such calls.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 20; 2007, ch. 480, § 1; 2012, ch. 705, § 1; 2013, ch. 116, §§ 1-3.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A and Class C misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

7-86-317. Rules and regulations.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the board shall promulgate rules and regulations to safeguard proprietary information submitted to the board. Such rules and regulations shall be consistent with determinations, actions, customs, and practices of the Tennessee regulatory agency with respect to proprietary information. Any information determined to be proprietary in accordance with such rules and regulations shall be confidential and shall not be open to the public for inspection, notwithstanding the public records provisions of title 10, chapter 7.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 21.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

7-86-318. Part not to be construed to regulate commercial mobile radio service (CMRS).

Nothing in this part shall be construed to constitute the regulation of the entry or of rates charged by CMRS providers for any service or feature that they provide to their CMRS customers, or to prohibit a CMRS provider from charging a CMRS subscriber for any service or feature provided to such customer.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 22.

7-86-319. Duty of commercial providers no greater than that of noncommercial providers.

A commercial mobile radio service provider shall not have any greater responsibility or duty to its customers or other persons with respect to 911 calls and the operation of a 911 system than does a noncommercial mobile radio service provider to its customers or other persons.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 23.

7-86-320. Immunity or protection from liability.

If a provider of an IP-enabled service offers 911 or E911 services and such provider complies with federal communication commission Order #05-116, adopted May 19, 2005, that provider, its officers, directors, employees, vendors, and agents, shall have immunity or other protection from liability of a scope and extent that is not less than the scope and extent of immunity or other protection from liability that any incumbent local exchange carrier in the provider's service area, and its officers, directors, employees, vendors, or agents, have under applicable law, whether through statute, judicial decision, tariffs filed by the local exchange company, or otherwise, including in connection with an act or omission involving the release of subscriber information related to the emergency calls or emergency services to a public safety answering point (PSAP), emergency medical service provider, emergency dispatch provider, public safety, fire service, or law enforcement official, or hospital emergency or trauma care facility.

A person using an IP-enabled service that offers 911 or E911 services pursuant to this section shall have immunity or other protection from liability of a scope and extent that is not less than the scope and extent of immunity or other protection from liability under applicable law in similar circumstances of a person using 911 or E911 service that is not provided through an IP-enabled voice service.

In matters related to IP-enabled 911 and E911 communications, a PSAP, and its employees, vendors, agents, and authorizing government entity, if any, shall have immunity or other protection from liability of a scope and extent that is not less than the scope and extent of immunity or other protection from liability under applicable law accorded to the PSAP, employees, vendors, agents, and authorizing government entity, respective, in matters related to 911 or E911 communications that are not provided via an IP-enabled service.

Emergency communications districts shall be immune from suit or liability for civil claims arising from the actions or omission of emergency communications district personnel in processing emergency calls, except that claims for recklessness or intentional misconduct in processing emergency calls shall be permitted, but damages for such claims shall not exceed actual damages or the maximum award that may be awarded per claimant by the Tennessee claims commission.

A provider or user of 911 services or next generation 911 services, a public safety answering point, and the officers, directors, employees, vendors, agents, and authorizing government entity, if any, of such provider, user, or public safety answering point, shall have immunity and protection from liability under federal and state law to the extent provided in subdivision (d)(1) with respect to:

The release of subscriber information related to emergency calls or emergency services;

The use or provision of 911 services, E911 services, or next generation 911 services; and

Other matters related to 911 services, E911 services, or next generation 911 services.

A dealer or provider of telecommunications service and other services, a user of such services, and a public safety answering point, and the officers, directors, employees, agents, vendors, and authorizing government entity, if any, involved in providing 911 service, shall not be liable for:

Any civil claim, damage, or loss caused by an act or omission in the design, development, installation, maintenance, or provision of 911 service;

The release of subscriber information related to emergency calls or emergency services; and

Other matters related to the provision of 911 service.

Acts 2006, ch. 925, § 6; 2014, ch. 795, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “911 Funding Modernization and IP Transition Act of 2014”.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 15. January 1, 2015.